Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 3 Tennessee Condominium Act of 2008 — Units and Allocation of Common and Limited Elements
66-27-322. Submission of a unit to an additional declaration.

A unit may be submitted to an additional declaration creating a new condominium if the submittal is permitted by the declaration creating the unit.

The submission of a unit to an additional declaration shall not be deemed a subdivision of a unit under § 66-27-313.

Upon the submittal of a unit to an additional declaration, the following shall apply:

The appurtenant interest of the unit in the common elements shall be allocated to the units created under the additional declaration pursuant to the terms of the additional declaration;

The association under the additional declaration shall pay all assessments due with respect to the unit submitted to an additional declaration and may exercise any of the rights that may be exercised by the owner of the unit;

The lien for assessments in favor of the association created under the original declaration shall not attach to any unit created under an additional declaration if the owner of the unit has paid the unit's share of the assessment to either the association created under the original declaration or to the association created under the additional declaration;

The units created under an additional declaration shall be subject to the terms and conditions of the original declaration, as it may be supplemented by the additional declaration; and

Members of the board of directors of the association created under the original declaration may be elected in any of the following ways specified in the original declaration:

All unit owners of units created under the original declaration shall elect all members of the board of directors and the vote of any unit subject to an additional declaration shall be cast by a representative of the association created under the additional declaration;

The board of directors of any association created under an additional declaration may elect specified members of the board of directors under the original declaration;

Specified members of the board of directors or specified officers of the association created by the additional declaration may be deemed elected as specified members of the board of directors under the original declaration; or

Any other manner provided in the original declaration permitted under the laws applicable to nonprofit corporations.

Any unit created by submitting a unit to an additional declaration may be further submitted to an additional declaration subject to this section if permitted pursuant to all declarations applicable to the unit.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-323. Merger or consolidation of condominiums.

Any two (2) or more condominiums, by agreement of the unit owners as provided in subsection (b), may be merged or consolidated into a single condominium. In the event of a merger or consolidation, unless the agreement otherwise provides, the resultant condominium is, for all purposes, the legal successor of all of the preexisting condominiums and the operations and activities of all associations of the preexisting condominiums shall be merged or consolidated into a single association, which shall hold all powers, rights, obligations, assets and liabilities of all preexisting associations.

An agreement of two (2) or more condominiums to merge or consolidate pursuant to subsection (a) must be evidenced by an agreement prepared, executed, recorded and certified by the president of the association of each of the preexisting condominiums following approval by owners of units to which are allocated the percentage of votes in each condominium required to terminate that condominium, or such other percentage of votes as may be required by the declarations of each of the merging condominiums. Any such agreement must be recorded in every county in which a portion of the condominium is located and is not effective until recorded.

Every merger or consolidation agreement must provide for the reallocation of the allocated interests in the new association among the units of the resultant condominium, either by stating the reallocations or the formulas upon which they are based or by stating the percentage of overall allocated interests of the new condominium that are allocated to all of the units comprising each of the preexisting condominiums, and providing that the portion of the percentages allocated to each unit formerly comprising a part of the preexisting condominium must be equal to the percentages of allocated interests allocated to that unit by the declaration of the preexisting condominium.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.